District of Columbia statutes.
2-504

Official publications.

(a)

The Mayor shall cause to be published the official publications known as the District of Columbia Register and the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations pursuant to subchapter III of this chapter.

(b)

All courts within the District shall take judicial notice of rules, regulations, and Council acts and resolutions published or of which notice is given in the District of Columbia Register or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations pursuant to subchapter III of this chapter.

(c)

Publication in the District of Columbia Register of Council acts and resolutions, regulations adopted, amended, or repealed by the District of Columbia Council and rules adopted, amended, or repealed by the Mayor or by any agency shall not be considered as a substitute for publication in 1 or more newspapers of general circulation when such publication is required by statute.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 1206, Pub. L. 90-614, § 5
Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title I, § 102(t)-(x), 22 DCR 2051
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96,§ 3(a), 23 DCR 9532b
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-120, § 2, 23 DCR 9924
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 6(a), 25 DCR 6960

Cross References

“District of Columbia Register” defined, see § 2-601.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-309.14, § 1-606.10, § 2-502, § 2-601, and § 11-1525.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1505.
1973 Ed., § 1-1504.